Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.105.020

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "GET units" means tuition units under the advanced college tuition payment program in chapter 28B.95 RCW.

(2) "Institution of higher education" has the same meaning as in RCW 28B.92.030(4) (a) and (b) (i) and (ii).

(3) "Office" means the office of student financial assistance.

(4) "Program administrator" means the private nonprofit corporation that is registered under Title 24 RCW and qualified as a tax-exempt entity under section 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code, that will serve as the private partner in the public-private partnership under this chapter.

(5) "Qualified program" or "qualified major" means a mathematics, science, or related degree program or major line of study offered by an institution of higher education that is included on the list of programs or majors selected by the office and the program administrator under RCW 28B.105.100.

[ 2013 c 248 s 3; 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 183; 2007 c 214 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2013 c 248: See notes following RCW 28B.92.030.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.